Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB609.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6011(b) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6011. Affordable housing programs fee in counties.* * *(b) Limitation.--The additional fees levied by a governing body of a county under subsection (a) shall not exceed 100% of the amounts charged [on February 12, 1993.] by the county for recording deeds and mortgages.(c) Construction.--Subsection (a) shall not limit or otherwise impact the authority of a county to alter the fees levied by the county as of the effective date of this subsection 1234567891011121314151617181920 for recording deeds and mortgages.Section 2. Title 53 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 6014. Reporting requirements.(a) County reporting.--Beginning July 1, 2025, and no later than each July 1 thereafter, a county collecting proceeds as a result of the fee levied under section 6011(a) (relating to affordable housing programs fee in counties) shall submit an annual report to the advisory committee established under section 6015 (relating to Pennsylvania Affordable Housing Advisory Committee) on a form and in a manner prescribed by the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(b) Content of reports.--Each annual report required under subsection (a) must contain all of the following information for the preceding fiscal year:(1) The total amount of money collected by the county as a result of the fee under section 6011(a) and the total amount allocated by the county from that money.(2) Amounts and descriptions of the county's allocations made from money collected as a result of the fee levied under section 6011(a) to a separate account for the purpose of funding affordable housing efforts as described in section 6012(b)(1) (relating to disposition of proceeds in counties).(3) Amounts and descriptions of the county's allocations made from money collected as a result of the fee levied under section 6011(a) for the purpose of covering administrative costs associated with the affordable housing efforts as described in section 6012(b)(2).(4) A description of the county's affordable housing efforts funded by the money collected by the county as a result of the fee levied under section 6011(a).20250SB0609PN0615 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The county's recommendations, if any, regarding additional needs of the county to address affordable housing challenges.(c) Duties of Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.--(1) The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall prescribe the form and manner of the annual reports required under subsection (a).(2) Annual reports submitted under this section shall be posted to the publicly accessible Internet website of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.§ 6015. Pennsylvania Affordable Housing Advisory Committee.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Affordable Housing Advisory Committee is established within the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(b) Composition.--The advisory committee shall consist of the following members:(1) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency or a designee. The designee under this paragraph must be an employee of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency. The Executive Director or designee shall serve as the chairperson of the advisory committee.(2) The following individuals to be appointed by the Governor within 30 days of the effective date of this paragraph:(i) Six individuals who:(A) represent the counties collecting proceeds as a result of the fee levied under section 6011(a) (relating to affordable housing programs fee in counties);(B) are employed by counties involved in the 20250SB0609PN0615 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operation of one or more affordable housing efforts under this subchapter; and(C) represent different geographical regions of this Commonwealth.(ii) One individual representing the Housing Alliance of Pennsylvania.(iii) One individual representing the Pennsylvania chapter of the American Institute of Architects.(iv) One individual representing residential real estate developers.(v) One individual representing construction trades.(vi) One individual representing mortgage lenders.(vii) One individual representing the interests of persons with disabilities.(viii) One individual representing home builders.(ix) One individual representing neighborhood groups.(x) One individual representing low-income families.(xi) One individual representing service providers serving low-income families.(xii) One individual representing nonprofit community-based organizations and community development corporations.(xiii) One individual representing real estate brokers or salespersons.(xiv) One individual representing apartment owners.(xv) One individual representing renters.(xvi) One individual representing the manufactured housing industry.(c) Quorum and voting.--20250SB0609PN0615 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Nine members of the advisory committee shall constitute a quorum.(2) A vote of the majority of the members of the advisory committee shall prevail.(d) Terms.--(1) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall serve as a member and the chairperson of the advisory committee if that individual continues to serve in the official capacity of Executive Director.(2) Advisory committee members appointed under subsection (b)(2) shall be appointed to staggered three-year terms, as determined by the Governor. An advisory committee member may be reappointed for an additional term.(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), an advisory committee member whose term expires shall continue as a member of the advisory committee until a replacement has been appointed. The member shall have full voting rights and count for purposes of establishing a quorum.(ii) A member may not continue to serve on the advisory committee beyond six months from the date of the expiration of the member's term.(4) An individual appointed to fill a vacancy on the advisory committee under subsection (e) shall serve for the unexpired term and shall be eligible for reappointment.(e) Vacancies.--If a vacancy occurs on the advisory committee, the Governor shall appoint a successor member within 30 days of the vacancy.(f) Meetings.--The advisory committee shall meet in accordance with the following:(1) Advisory committee members shall meet no fewer than 20250SB0609PN0615 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 four times per year on a quarterly basis, but may hold additional meetings as are called by the chairperson of the advisory committee.(2) The agenda for each meeting of the advisory committee and all meeting minutes of the advisory committee shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency. Information regarding the agendas and minutes shall be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) Meetings of the advisory committee shall comply with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(g) Compensation and reimbursement.--(1) Advisory committee members shall not be entitled to compensation for their service as advisory committee members.(2) Advisory committee members shall be entitled to reimbursement in accordance with Commonwealth guidelines for reasonable travel, lodging and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as advisory committee members.(h) Powers.--The advisory committee shall have the power to advise and consult the Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency and counties collecting proceeds as a result of the fee levied under section 6011(a) on affordable housing efforts as defined in section 6013 (relating to a ffordable housing efforts in counties) and how to expand or improve affordable housing efforts.(i) Duties.--The advisory committee shall have the following duties:20250SB0609PN0615 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) To meet to share, study and consider challenges to county affordable housing efforts in addition to existing and new affordable housing efforts that demonstrate success in increasing access to affordable housing in the counties.(2) To review the most recent annual reports submitted by the counties under section 6014 (relating to reporting requirements).(3) Beginning no later than January 1, 2026, and by each January 1 thereafter, to provide an annual report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives. Each annual report:(i) Must contain the following information:(A) The activities of the advisory committee.(B) A summary of the most recent annual reports submitted by the counties under section 6014.(C) Recommendations of the advisory committee to:(I) Address challenges to affordable housing efforts.(II) Improve the efficiency and value of counties' use of proceeds collected in accordance with section 6011(a) on affordable housing efforts.(III) Address new affordable housing efforts that demonstrate success in increasing access to affordable housing.(ii) Shall be posted on the publicly accessible 20250SB0609PN0615 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internet website of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(j) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory committee." The Pennsylvania Affordable Housing Advisory Committee established under subsection (a).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0609PN0615 - 8 - 12345678